Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 42 Wyoming Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association
§ 26-42-110.
Prevention of insolvencies.

To aid in the detection and prevention of member insurer insolvencies or impairments, the commissioner shall:

Notify the commissioners of all the other states, territories of the United States and the District of Columbia by mail within thirty (30) days of any of the following actions taken against a member insurer:

Revocation of license;

Suspension of license; or

Issuance of any formal order requiring the member insurer to:

Restrict its premium writing;

Obtain additional contributions to surplus;

Withdraw from the state;

Reinsure all or any part of its business; or

Increase capital, surplus or any other account for the security of policy owners, contract owners, certificate holders or creditors.

Report to the board of directors when he has taken any actions provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection or has received a report from any other commissioner indicating that any action provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection has been taken in another state. The report to the board of directors shall contain all significant details of the action taken or the report received from another commissioner;

Report to the board of directors when he has reasonable cause to believe from any completed or pending examination of any member company that the company may be an impaired or insolvent insurer;

Furnish to the board of directors the national association of insurance commissioners insurance regulatory information system ratios and listings of companies not included in the ratios developed by the national association of insurance commissioners, and the board may use this information in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this section. The report and its information shall be kept confidential by the board of directors until the commissioner or other lawful authority makes it a public record.

The commissioner may seek the advice and recommendations of the board of directors concerning any matter affecting his duties and responsibilities regarding the financial condition of member insurers and insurers or health maintenance organizations seeking admission to transact business in this state.

The board of directors may by majority vote make reports and recommendations to the commissioner upon any matter germane to the solvency, liquidation, rehabilitation or conservation of any member insurer or germane to the solvency of any insurers or health maintenance organizations seeking to do any business in this state. The reports and recommendations are confidential and shall not be considered public documents.

It is the duty of the board of directors by majority vote to notify the commissioner of any information indicating any member insurer may be an impaired or insolvent insurer.

The board of directors may by majority vote request that the commissioner order an examination of any member insurer which the board in good faith believes may be an impaired or insolvent insurer. Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of a request, the commissioner shall begin an examination. The examination may be conducted as a national association of insurance commissioners examination or may be conducted by persons designated by the commissioner. The cost of the examination shall be paid by the association and the examination report shall be treated the same as other examination reports. In no event shall the examination report be released to the board of directors prior to its release to the public, but this shall not preclude the commissioner from complying with subsection (a) of this section. The commissioner shall notify the board of directors when the examination is completed. The request for an examination shall be kept on file by the commissioner but it shall not be open to public inspection prior to the release of the examination report to the public.

The board of directors may by majority vote make recommendations to the commissioner for the detection and prevention of member insurer insolvencies.

The board of directors shall at the conclusion of any insurer insolvency in which the association was obligated to pay covered claims prepare a report to the commissioner containing information it has in its possession bearing on the history and causes of the insolvency. The board shall cooperate with the boards of directors of guaranty associations in other states in preparing a report on the history and causes of insolvency of a particular insurer and may adopt by reference any report prepared by other associations.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a) and in (f), added "member" preceding "insurer," in the introductory language in (a)(i)(C), substituted "member insurer" for "company," in (a)(i)(C)(V), substituted "policy owners, contract owners, certificate holders or creditors" for "policyholders or creditors"; in (b), substituted "insurers or health maintenance organizations seeking admission to transact business" for "companies seeking admission to transact insurance business"; in (c), substituted "insurers or health maintenance organizations seeking to do any business" for "company seeking to do any insurance business."

§ 26-42-111.
Credits for assessments paid; tax offsets.

A member insurer may offset against its premium tax liability to this state an assessment described in W.S. 26-42-107(k) to the extent of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the assessment for each of the ten (10) calendar years following the year in which the assessment was paid. If a member insurer ceases doing business, all uncredited assessments may be credited against its premium tax liability for the year it ceases doing business.

Any sums which are acquired by refund pursuant to W.S. 26-42-107(h) from the association by member insurers and which have been offset against premium taxes as provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall be paid by the member insurers to this state as required by the commissioner. The association shall notify the commissioner that the refunds have been made.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), added "member" preceding "insurers to this state."

§ 26-42-112.
Assessment liability; records; assets; proceedings against impaired or insolvent insurer.

This act shall not be construed to reduce the liability for unpaid assessments of the insureds of an impaired or insolvent insurer operating under a plan with assessment liability.

Records shall be kept of all meetings in which the board of directors discuss the activities of the association in carrying out its powers and duties under W.S.

26-42-106

. The records of the association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be disclosed prior to the termination of a liquidation, rehabilitation or conservation proceeding involving the impaired or insolvent insurer except upon the termination of the impairment or insolvency of the insurer or upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the duty of the association to render a report of its activities under W.S.

26-42-113

.

For the purpose of carrying out its obligations under this act, the association is deemed to be a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer to the extent of assets attributable to covered policies or contracts reduced by any amounts to which the association is entitled as assignee or subrogee pursuant to W.S. 26-42-106(q). Assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies or contracts shall be used to continue all covered policies or contracts and pay all contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer as required by this act. As used in this subsection, “assets attributable to covered policies or contracts” means that proportion of the assets which the reserves that should have been established for such policies or contracts bear to the reserves that should have been established for all policies or contracts of insurance or health benefits plans written by the impaired or insolvent insurer.

Prior to the termination of any liquidation, rehabilitation or conservation proceeding the court may consider the contributions of the respective parties including the association, the shareholders, contract owners, certificate holders, enrollees and policy owners of the insolvent insurer, and any other party with a bona fide interest, in making an equitable distribution of the ownership rights of the insolvent insurer. In such a determination consideration shall be given to the welfare of the owners, contract owners, certificate holders and enrollees of the continuing or successor insurer. No distribution to stockholders, if any, of an impaired or insolvent insurer shall be made until and unless the total amount of valid claims and interest on the claims of the association for funds expended in carrying out its powers and duties under W.S.

26-42-106

with respect to the member insurer have been fully recovered by the association.

If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of a member insurer domiciled in this state is entered, the receiver appointed under the order shall have a right to recover on behalf of the member insurer from any affiliate that controlled it, the amount of distributions other than stock dividends paid by the member insurer on its capital stock, made at any time during the five (5) years preceding the petition for liquidation or rehabilitation subject to the limitations of subsections (f), (g) and (h) of this section.

No distribution pursuant to subsection (e) of this section is recoverable if the member insurer shows that when paid the distribution was lawful and reasonable and that the member insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known the distribution might adversely affect the ability of the member insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations.

Any person who was an affiliate that controlled the member insurer at the time the distributions were paid is liable up to the amount of distributions he received. Any person who was an affiliate that controlled the member insurer at the time the distributions were declared is liable up to the amount of distributions he would have received if they had been paid immediately. If two (2) or more persons are liable with respect to the same distributions they are jointly and severally liable.

The maximum amount recoverable under subsections (e) through (g) of this section is the amount needed in excess of all other available assets of the insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the insolvent insurer.

If any person liable under subsection (g) of this section is insolvent, all its affiliates that controlled it at the time the distribution was paid are jointly and severally liable for any resulting deficiency in the amount recovered from the insolvent affiliate.

As a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer as established in subsection (c) of this section, the association and other similar associations shall be entitled to receive a disbursement of assets out of the marshaled assets, from time to time as the assets become available to reimburse it, as a credit against contractual obligations under this act. If the liquidator has not, within one hundred twenty (120) days of a final determination of insolvency of a member insurer by the receivership court, made an application to the court for the approval of a proposal to disburse assets out of marshaled assets to guaranty associations having obligations because of the insolvency, then the association shall be entitled to make application to the receivership court for approval of its own proposal to disburse these assets.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (b), deleted “negotiations and” preceding “meetings,” substituted “board of directors” for “association or its representatives”; in the second sentence of (b), substituted “The records of the association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be disclosed prior to” for “Records of negotiations or meetings shall be made public only upon,” inserted “except” preceding “upon the termination”; and added (k).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), added "or contracts" following "policies" throughout, substituted "W.S. 26-42-106(q)" for "W.S. 26-42-106(p)," and added "or health benefits plans" in the last sentence; in (d) added "contract owners, certificate holders, enrollees" following "shareholders," substituted "owners, contract owners, certificate holders and enrollees" for "policyholders," and added "member" preceding "insurer" in the last sentence; in (e) and (k), substituted "a member insurer" for "an insurer"; in (e), (f), and (g), added "member" preceding "insurer" throughout.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and in the first two sentences in subsection (c), see § 26-42-102(a)(xii).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Primary insurer's insolvency as affecting excess insurer's liability, 85 ALR4th 729.

§ 26-42-113.
Examination of the association; annual report.

The association is subject to examination and regulation by the commissioner. The board of directors shall submit to the commissioner each year not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the association’s fiscal year, a financial report in a form approved by the commissioner and a report of its activities during the preceding fiscal year.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1.

§ 26-42-114.
Tax exemptions.

The association is exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by this state or any of its subdivisions except taxes levied on real property.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1.

§ 26-42-115.
Stay of proceedings; reopening default judgments.

All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party in any court in this state shall be stayed one hundred eighty (180) days from the date an order of liquidation, rehabilitation or conservation is final to permit proper legal action by the association on any matters germane to its powers or duties. As to judgment under any decision, order, verdict or finding based on default the association may apply to have the judgment set aside by the same court that made the judgment and shall be permitted to defend against the suit on the merits.

History:

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence, substituted “one hundred eighty (180)” for “sixty (60).”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Circumstances in which indefinite stay of proceedings in federal civil case constitutes abuse of discretion or is otherwise unlawful, 150 ALR Fed 577.

§ 26-42-116.
Prohibited advertisement of association chapter in insurance sales; notice.

No person including a member insurer, agent or affiliate of an insurer shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate or place before the public, or cause directly or indirectly to be made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the public in any newspaper, magazine or other publication, in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter or poster, over any radio station or television station, or in any other way, any advertisement, announcement or written or oral statement which uses the existence of the association of this state for the purpose of sales, solicitation or inducement to purchase any form of insurance or other coverage covered by this act. This subsection shall not apply to the association or any other entity which does not sell or solicit insurance or health maintenance organization coverage.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, the association shall prepare a summary document describing the general purposes and current limitations of the act and complying with subsection (c) of this section and submit it to the commissioner for approval. Sixty (60) days after receiving approval, no member insurer may deliver a policy or contract described in W.S. 26-42-103(b) to a policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee unless the document provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section is delivered to the policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee prior to or at the time of delivery of the policy or contract except if subsection (d) of this section applies. The document shall be available upon request by a policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee. The distribution, delivery or contents or interpretation of the document shall not mean that either the policy or the contract or the policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee would be covered in the event of impairment or insolvency of a member insurer. The description document shall be revised by the association as required by this act. Failure to receive the document does not give the policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee any greater rights than those stated in this act.

The document prepared under subsection (b) of this section shall contain a clear and conspicuous disclaimer on its face. The commissioner shall promulgate a rule establishing the form and content of the disclaimer. The disclaimer shall:

State the name and address of the life and health insurance guaranty association and insurance department;

Prominently warn the policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee that the association may not cover the policy or contract or if coverage is available, it will be subject to substantial limitations and exclusions and conditioned on continued residence in the state;

State that the member insurer and its agents are prohibited by law from using the existence of the association for the purpose of sales, solicitation or inducement to purchase any form of insurance or health maintenance organization coverage;

Emphasize that the policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee should not rely on coverage under the association when selecting an insurer or health maintenance organization;

Provide other information as directed by the commissioner.

Insurers and agents shall deliver the document and disclaimer described under subsections (b) and (c) of this section when a customer is solicited if a “free look” period is not provided in the policy.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 21, § 2.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (e) which read: “No insurer or agent may deliver a policy or contract described in W.S. 26-42-103(b) but excluded by W.S. 26-42-103(c)(i) from coverage under this act unless the insurer or agent prior to or at the time of delivery gives the policyholder or contract holder a separate written notice which clearly and conspicuously discloses that the policy or contract is not covered by the association. The commissioner shall by rule specify the form and content of the notice.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted "a member insurer" for "an insurer," added "or other coverage" following "form of insurance"; in (a) and (c)(iii), added "or health maintenance organization coverage"; in (b), substituted "no member insurer" for "no insurer"; in (b), (c)(ii), and (c)(iv), substituted "policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee" for "policyholder or contract holder" throughout; in (b), substituted "policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee" for "policyholder," and "policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder or enrollee" for "policyholder, contract holder, certificate holder or insured"; in (c)(ii), added "or contract" following "policy," in (c)(iii), added "member" preceding "insurer", and in (c)(iv), added "or health maintenance organization" at the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (a), (b) and (e), see § 26-42-102(a)(xii).

§ 26-42-117.
Immunity.

Except as provided by W.S. 26-42-106(r)(ii), 26-42-109(b) and

26-42-112

, there shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against any member insurer or its agents or employees, the association or its agents or employees, members of the board of directors or the commissioner or his representatives, for any action or omission by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this act. Immunity shall extend to the participation in any organization of one (1) or more other state associations of similar purposes and to any such organization and its agents or employees.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "W.S. 26-42-106(r)(ii)" for "W.S. 26-42-106(q)(ii)."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 26-42-102(a)(xii).

§ 26-42-118.
Prospective application.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act shall apply to any member insurer which is placed under an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency on or after July 1, 2014.

The amendments provided in the 2014 amendments to W.S. 26-24-103(a) and (d) shall not apply to any member insurer placed under an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency prior to July 1, 2014.

The amendments provided in the 2019 amendments to this act shall not apply to any member insurer placed under an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency prior to July 1, 2019.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (a) designation; rewrote present (a); and added (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), added "member" preceding "insurer"; and added (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-42-102(a)(xii).